Massachusetts, session 194th, S1413.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 66 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “chapter 90” the following 
words:- “and all revenues received by the commonwealth from public and private sources as 
gifts, grants and donations”. 
SECTION 2.  Section 66A of said chapter 10 is hereby amended by inserting after the 
words “chapter 272” the following words:- “and all revenues received by the commonwealth 
from public and private sources as gifts, grants and donations”.